District of Columbia statutes.
38-2001.11

Consent to deductions.

Every teacher who shall continue in the service of the public schools of the District of Columbia after January 15, 1920, as well as every person who on and after January 15, 1920, may be appointed to a position as teacher in the public schools of the District of Columbia, shall be deemed to consent and agree to the deductions made and provided for in this subchapter; and the salary, pay, or compensation, which may be paid monthly or at any other time, shall be full and complete discharge and acquittance of all claims and demands whatsoever for all services rendered by such teacher during the period covered by such payment, except his claim for the benefits to which he may be entitled under the provisions of this subchapter, notwithstanding the provisions of said Public Act No. 254, approved June 20, 1906, and of any other law, rule or regulation affecting the salary, pay, or compensation of the teachers employed in the service of the public schools of the District of Columbia.

History

Jan. 15, 1920, 41 Stat. 389, ch. 39, § 11
June 11, 1926, 44 Stat. 730, ch. 556, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1212.
1973 Ed., § 31-712.

References in Text

“Public Act No. 254, approved June 20, 1906,” referred to near the end of the section, refers to the Act of June 20, 1906, 34 Stat. 316, ch. 3446.